dev/apertium-tat.tat.lexc
LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<pl%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;                       ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{а%}%{с%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{а%}%{с%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

LEXICON NPCOGFLEX

! This isn't used at the moment,
! but e.g. ?Polish cognoms ending with -ска would take this cont.class /I.S./ 

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NPORGLEX

%<np%>%<org%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NPALLEX

%<np%>%<al%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NUMLEX

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<dist%>:%>%{A%}р FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<dist%>:%>%{A%}р FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>: # ;

!LEXICON DIGITLEX
!
!%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-BIRE

ADV ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>:дәге COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON ADVITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CCLEX

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CSLEX

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON QST

%<qst%>: # ; 

LEXICON MOD-ASS

%<mod_ass%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD-IND

%<mod_ind%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON IDEO

%<ideo%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


!======================!
 LEXICON ModalParticles
!======================!


! FIXME: consider "әле" and "әллә"
!
! #1 "әле" after imperative and optative forms has a meaning somewhat similar to
!     Russian "-ка" (e.g. "скажи-ка") - e.g. "әйт әле", "кайтыйк әле";           ?>> <mod_foc>
! #2 Нәрсә булды соң әле? = Что же случилось?
!
! #4 Күрешербез әле. = Еще увидимся.
!
! #3 Әле кичә генә. = Еще вчера; Только вчера.
!
! But if for all above examples "әлі <-> әле" translation works, distinguishing between the meanings
! might be not needed, we'll just have to choose an appropriate tag.
!-----
! "әллә" can appear both before and after the word it is related to:
!
! #1 "- Абау, миңа әллә нәрсә булган!"
! #2 "Канатлы дигәч тә, мин кошмы әллә?"
!-------------------------------------------------------------------

! Question modal particles
! ========================

мы:%~мы QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/RL
мы:мы QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/LR
мы:ме QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/LR
мыни:%~мыни QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/RL
мыни:мыни QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/LR
мыни:мени QST ; ! "y/n question" ! Dir/LR
микән:микән QST ; ! originated from "-мы икән"

! Assertive (emphasizing) modal particles
! =======================================

бит:бит MOD-ASS ;
ич:ич MOD-ASS ;
ласа:ласа MOD-ASS ;
ләбаса:ләбаса MOD-ASS ;
ләбаса:лабаса MOD-ASS ; ! Dir/LR

! Indefinite modal particles
! ==========================

дыр:%~дыр MOD-IND ; ! "" ! Dir/RL
дыр:дыр MOD-IND ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
тыр:тыр MOD-IND ; ! "" ! Dir/LR


!==============!
 LEXICON Copula
!==============!


!и:и COP-I ; ! ""
COP-I ; ! ""


!=====================!
 LEXICON Postpositions
!=====================!


! Many of them are derived from other parts of speech.
! There is also a special category of nouns (like "front", "back", "center" etc) - so caled "auxilliary nouns"
! ("служебные имена") - which are used as postpositioins when they take possessive endings and location cases.
! They govern both nominative and genitive (with noun in genitive referring to a definite object), e.g.:
! # Шкаф эчендә / Шкаф ішінде  =  in a cupboard
! # Шкафның эчендә / Шкафтың ішінде  =  in the cupboard
!
! Currently these words are tagged as nouns (see the subsection at the end of the Nouns lexicon)

! which Govern the Nominative Case
! ================================

тапкыр:тапкыр POST ; ! "" FIXME CHECK pos - a noun?

! which Govern the Nominative Case of Nouns and
! the Genitive Case of (Personal and Demonstrative) Pronouns
! ==========================================================

аркылы:аркылы POST ; ! ""
астына:астына POST ; ! ""
астында:астында POST ; ! ""
аша:аша POST ; ! ""
белән:белән POST ; ! ""
буе:буе POST ; ! ""
буенда:буенда POST ; ! ""
буенча:буенча POST ; ! ""
буйлап:буйлап POST ; ! ""
карамагындагы:карамагындагы POST ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
карамагында:карамагында POST ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
кебек:кебек POST ; ! ""
күк:күк POST ; ! ""
максатында:максатында POST ; ! "" Use/MT
өчен:өчен POST ; ! ""
саен:саен POST ; ! ""
сыман:сыман POST ; ! ""
турында:турында POST ; ! ""
хакында:хакында POST ; ! ""
шикелле:шикелле POST ; ! ""

! which Govern Nominative/Genitive/Dative cases
! =============================================

кадәр:кадәр POST ; ! ""
тикле:тикле POST ; ! ""
хәтле:хәтле POST ; ! ""
чаклы:чаклы POST ; ! ""

! which Govern the Dative Case
! ============================

караганда:караганда POST ; ! ""
карамастан:карамастан POST ; ! ""
карамый:карамый POST ; ! ""
карата:карата POST ; ! ""
каршы:каршы POST ; ! ""
күрә:күрә POST ; ! ""
өстәп:өстәп POST ; ! ""
таба:таба POST ; ! ""
тәгаенләнгән:тәгаенләнгән POST ; ! "" Use/MT
якын:якын POST ; ! ""
ярашлы% рәвештә:ярашлы% рәвештә POST ; ! "" Use/MT

! which Govern the Ablative Case
! ==============================

ары:ары POST ; ! "+ABL"
башка:башка POST ; ! "+ABL"
бирле:бирле POST ; ! "+ABL"
бүтән:бүтән POST ; ! "+ABL"
соң:соң POST ; ! "after+ABL"
тыш:тыш POST ; ! "+ABL"
элек:элек POST ; ! "+ABL"

! which require "белән" before them
! =================================

бергә:бергә POST ; ! "" + INS
беррәттән:беррәттән POST ; ! "along with" + INS

! FIXME: To be checked
! ====================

буларак:буларак POST ; ! ""


!===================!
 LEXICON Postadverbs
!===================!


гына:%~гына POSTADV ; ! "only" Dir/RL
гына:гына POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:генә POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:кына POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:кенә POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR

да:%~да POSTADV ; ! "1. even if" Dir/RL
да:да POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:дә POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:та POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:тә POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR

ук:%~ук POSTADV ; ! "же, даже" Dir/RL
ук:ук POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR
ук:үк POSTADV ; ! "" Dir/LR


!================!
 LEXICON Pronouns
!================!


PersonalPronouns ;

DemonstrativePronouns ;

InterrogativePronouns ;


башка:башка PRON-IND ; ! "other"
бер% нәрсә:бер% нәрсә PRON-IND ; ! "something" Use/MT
кайбер:кайбер PRON-IND ; ! "some"

барлык:барлык PRON-QNT ; ! ""
бары:бары PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! ""
берәү:берәү PRON-QNT ; ! ""
һәркем:һәркем PRON-QNT ; ! ""

беркем:беркем PRNNEG ; ! ""
бернәрсә:бернәрсә PRNNEG ; ! ""
берни:берни PRNNEG ; ! ""
һичкем:һичкем PRNNEG ; ! ""
һичнәрсә:һичнәрсә PRNNEG ; ! ""

бер%-бер:бер%-бер PRON-RECIP ; ! "each-other, one another"

үз:үз PRON-REF ; ! "self"

 LEXICON Conjunctions
да:та CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:тә CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
ни:ни CCLEX ; ! "neither... , nor ... (x2)"
шулай% ук:шулай% ук CCLEX ; ! "likewise"
бары% тик:бары% тик CCLEX ; ! "but,just"
ләкин:ләкин CCLEX ; ! "but"
тик:тик CCLEX ; ! "but,just"
ә:ә CCLEX ; ! "contrastive and"
я:я CCLEX ; ! "or"
яки:яки CCLEX ; ! "or"
гүя:гүя CSLEX ; ! "as if"
гүяки:гүяки CSLEX ; ! "as if"
гәрчә:гәрчә CSLEX ; ! "even if"
ки:ки CSLEX ; ! "that, in order that"
чөнки:чөнки CSLEX ; ! "because"
ягъни:ягъни CSLEX ; ! "that is, то есть"
әгәр% дә:әгәр% дә CSLEX ; ! "if" Use/MT
әгәр:әгәр CSLEX ; ! "if"
аның% каравы:аның% каравы CA ; ! "nevertheless"
башкача% әйткәндә:башкача% әйткәндә CA ; ! ""
әйтүенчә:әйтүенчә CA ; ! ""
сүзләренчә:сүзләренчә CA ; ! ""
хәбәр% итүенчә:хәбәр% итүенчә CA ; ! ""
шул% сәбәпле:шул% сәбәпле CA ; ! "therefore"
шуңа% күрә:шуңа% күрә CA ; ! "therefore"
әйтүләренчә:әйтүләренчә CA ; ! ""
мәгълүматынча:мәгълүматынча CA ; ! ""
 LEXICON Numerals
нуль:нол NUMLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
бер:бер NUMLEX ; ! ""
биш:биш NUMLEX ; ! ""
тугыз:тугыз NUMLEX ; ! ""
унөч:унөч NUMLEX ; ! ""
унҗиде:унҗиде NUMLEX ; ! ""
утыз:утыз NUMLEX ; ! ""
җитмеш:җитмеш NUMLEX ; ! ""
мең:мең NUMLEX ; ! "thousand"
миллиард:миллиард NUMLEX ; ! "billion"
бер:берәү NUM-COLL ;
ике:икәү NUM-COLL ;
өч:өчәү NUM-COLL ;
дүрт:дүртәү NUM-COLL ;
биш:бишәү NUM-COLL ;
алты:алтау NUM-COLL ;
җиде:җидәү NUM-COLL ;
III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V NUM-ROMAN ;  ! ""
VII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
ничә:ничә NUM-ITG ;
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Васильевич:Василье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Иванович:Ивано NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Павлович:Павло NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Сергеевич:Сергее NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Янукович:Януко NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Ахметов:Ахметов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Бокаев:Бокаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Давыденов:Давыденов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Әбелов:Әбелов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Иванов:Иванов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Кириллов:Кириллов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Курмангалиев:Курмангалиев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Мешков:Мешков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Райбаев:Райбаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Тетерин:Тетерин NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Consolidated% Contractors% Company:Consolidated% Contractors% Company NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Freedom% House:Freedom% House NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Investment:Investment NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Kazakhmys:Kazakhmys NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Operating:Operating NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Актөбемунайгаз:Актөбемунайгаз NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Бритиш% Петролеум:Бритиш% Петролеум NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Әл%-Каидә:Әл%-Каидә NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Татар%-информ:Татар%-информ NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Майкрософт:Майкрософт NPORGLEX ; ! ""
Independent:Independent NPALLEX ; ! ""
Petroleum:Petroleum NPALLEX ; ! ""
Witness:Witness NPALLEX ; ! ""
Блумберг:Блумберг NPALLEX ; ! ""
Время:Время NPALLEX ; ! ""
Жуңгар:Жуңгар NPALLEX ; ! ""
Лада:Лада NPALLEX ; ! ""
Талибан:Талибан NPALLEX ; ! ""
Җабраил:Җабраил NPALLEX ; ! ""
Аймаңгай:Аймаңгай NPALLEX ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
кайда:кайда ADVITG ; ! ""
кайдан:кайдан ADVITG ; ! ""
кайчан:кайчан ADVITG ; ! ""
кая:кая ADVITG ; ! ""
ничек:ничек ADVITG ; ! "how"
ни% өчен:ни% өчен ADVITG ; ! "why,what for" Use/MT
никадәр:никадәр ADVITG ; ! ""
никадәрле:никадәрле ADVITG ; ! ""
нилектән:нилектән ADV ; ! ""
алайса:алайса ADV ; ! "~таким образом"
барынча:барынча ADV ; ! ""
берәм%-сәрәм:берәм%-сәрәм ADV ; ! ""
гадәттәгечә:гадәттәгечә ADV ; ! ""
җәяү:җәяү ADV ; ! ""
кырт:кырт ADV ; ! ""
тик:тик ADV ; ! "only""
шактый:шактый ADV ; ! ""
бу% юлы:бу% юлы ADV ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
бая:бая ADV-WITH-KI ; ! ""
борын:борын ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "earlier"
бүген:бүген ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "today"
быел:быел ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "this year"
әүвәл:әүвәл ADV-WITH-KI ; ! ""
кичә:кичә ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "yesterday"
көндез:көндез ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "during the day"
хәзер:хәзер ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "contrastive now"
әле:әле ADV-WITH-KI ; ! ""
бире:бире ADV-WITH-KI-BIRE ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
 LEXICON Abbreviations
KPO:KPO ABBR ; ! ""
АХХО:АХХО ABBR ; ! "eng. OSCE, rus. ОБСЕ"
б%.э%.:б%.э ABBR ;  ! "CE" Dir/LR
ГЭС:ГЭС ABBR ; ! ""
ҖЧҖ:ҖЧҖ ABBR ; ! "LLC"
кг:кг ABBR ;  ! "kg"
м³:м3 ABBR ;  ! "m³" Dir/LR
РФ:РФ ABBR ; ! "Russian Federation"
ТЭМ:ТЭМ ABBR ; ! ""
